src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaaddysk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kaaddâšǩ e-stem likasanko: # Noun - full paradigm
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Nom: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Gen: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Acc: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Ill: kadška
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Loc: kadšǩest
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Com: kadšǩin
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Ess: kadšǩen
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Par: kadšǩed
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [kaaddâšǩtaa, kaaddâšǩtää]
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Nom: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Gen: kadšǩi
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Acc: kadšǩid
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Ill: kadšǩid
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Loc: kadšǩin
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Com: kadšǩivuiʹm
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [kadšǩitaa, kadšǩitää]
